Florida, session 2026, SB1704.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 23 24 Section 1.âParagraphs (b) and (e) of subsection (17), 25 paragraphs (d) and (e) of subsection (18), paragraph (a) of 26 subsection (25), and paragraph (d) of subsection (26) of section 27 1002.33, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 28 1002.33âCharter schools.â 29 (17)âFUNDING.âStudents enrolled in a charter school, 30 regardless of the sponsorship, shall be funded based upon the 31 applicable program pursuant to s. 1011.62(1)(c), the same as 32 students enrolled in other public schools in a school district. 33 Funding for a charter lab school shall be as provided in s. 34 1002.32. 35 (b)1.âFunding for students enrolled in a charter school 36 sponsored by a school district shall be the sum of the school 37 districtâs operating funds from the Florida Education Finance 38 Program as defined in s. 1011.61(4) and the General 39 Appropriations Act, including gross state and local funds, and 40 funds from the school districtâs current operating discretionary 41 millage levy authorized under s. 1011.71(1) and (9); divided by 42 total funded weighted full-time equivalent students in the 43 school district; and multiplied by the weighted full-time 44 equivalent students for the charter school. Charter schools 45 whose students or programs meet the eligibility criteria in law 46 are entitled to their proportionate share of categorical program 47 funds included in the total funds available in the Florida 48 Education Finance Program by the Legislature, including the 49 student transportation allocation and the educational enrichment 50 allocation. Total funding for each charter school shall be 51 recalculated during the year to reflect the revised calculations 52 under the Florida Education Finance Program by the state and the 53 actual weighted full-time equivalent students reported by the 54 charter school during the full-time equivalent student survey 55 periods designated by the Commissioner of Education. For charter 56 schools operated by a not-for-profit or municipal entity, any 57 unrestricted current and capital assets identified in the 58 charter schoolâs annual financial audit may be used for other 59 charter schools operated by the not-for-profit or municipal 60 entity within the school district. For charter schools operated 61 by a not-for-profit entity, any unrestricted current or capital 62 assets identified in the charter schoolâs annual audit may be 63 used for other charter schools operated by the not-for-profit 64 entity which are located outside of the originating charter 65 schoolâs school district, but within the state, through an 66 unforgivable loan that must be repaid within 5 years to the 67 originating charter school by the receiving charter school. 68 Unrestricted current assets shall be used in accordance with s. 69 1011.62, and any unrestricted capital assets shall be used in 70 accordance with s. 1013.62(2). 71 2.a.âFunding for students enrolled in a charter school 72 sponsored by a state university or Florida College System 73 institution pursuant to paragraph (5)(a) shall be provided in 74 the Florida Education Finance Program as defined in s. 75 1011.61(4) and as specified in the General Appropriations Act. 76 The calculation to determine the amount of state funds includes 77 the sum of the base Florida Education Finance Program 78 established in s. 1011.62(1)(n), the discretionary millage 79 compression supplement established in s. 1011.62(5), and the 80 state-funded discretionary contribution established in s. 81 1011.62(6). Charter schools whose students or programs meet the 82 eligibility criteria in law are entitled to their proportionate 83 share of categorical program funds included in the total funds 84 available in the Florida Education Finance Program. The Florida 85 College System institution or state university sponsoring the 86 charter school shall be the fiscal agent for these funds, and 87 all rules of the institution governing the budgeting and 88 expenditure of state funds shall apply to these funds unless 89 otherwise provided by law or rule of the State Board of 90 Education. 91 (I)âThe nonvoted required local millage established 92 pursuant to s. 1011.71(1) that would otherwise be required for 93 the charter schools shall be allocated from state funds. 94 (II)âAn equivalent amount of funds for the operating 95 discretionary millage authorized pursuant to s. 1011.71(1) shall 96 be allocated to each charter school through a state-funded 97 discretionary contribution established pursuant to s. 98 1011.62(6). 99 (III)âThe comparable wage factor as provided in s. 100 1011.62(2) shall be established as 1.000. 101 b.âTotal funding for each charter school shall be 102 recalculated during the year to reflect the revised calculations 103 under the Florida Education Finance Program by the state and the 104 actual weighted full-time equivalent students reported by the 105 charter school during the full-time equivalent student survey 106 periods designated by the Commissioner of Education. 107 c.âThe Department of Education shall develop a tool that 108 each state university or Florida College System institution 109 sponsoring a charter school shall use for purposes of 110 calculating the funding amount for each eligible charter school 111 student. The total amount obtained from the calculation must be 112 appropriated from state funds in the General Appropriations Act 113 to the charter school. 114 d.âCapital outlay funding for a charter school sponsored by 115 a state university or Florida College System institution 116 pursuant to paragraph (5)(a) is determined as follows: multiply 117 the maximum allowable nonvoted discretionary millage under s. 118 1011.71(2) by 96 percent of the current yearâs taxable value for 119 school purposes for the district in which the charter school is 120 located; divide the result by the total full-time equivalent 121 student membership; and multiply the result by the full-time 122 equivalent student membership of the charter school. The amount 123 obtained shall be the discretionary capital improvement funds 124 and shall be appropriated from state funds in the General 125 Appropriations Act. 126 (e)âSponsors shall make timely and efficient payment and 127 reimbursement to charter schools, including processing paperwork 128 required to access special state and federal funding for which 129 they may be eligible, including the timely review and 130 reimbursement of federal grant funds. Payments of funds under 131 paragraph (b) shall be made monthly or twice a month, beginning 132 with the start of the sponsorâs fiscal year. Each payment shall 133 be one-twelfth, or one twenty-fourth, as applicable, of the 134 total state and local funds described in paragraph (b) and 135 adjusted as set forth therein. For the first 2 years of a 136 charter schoolâs operation, if a minimum of 75 percent of the 137 projected enrollment is entered into the sponsorâs student 138 information system by the first day of the current month, the 139 sponsor shall distribute funds to the school for the months of 140 July through October based on the projected full-time equivalent 141 student membership of the charter school as submitted in the 142 approved application. If less than 75 percent of the projected 143 enrollment is entered into the sponsorâs student information 144 system by the first day of the current month, the sponsor shall 145 base payments on the actual number of student enrollment entered 146 into the sponsorâs student information system. Thereafter, the 147 results of full-time equivalent student membership surveys shall 148 be used in adjusting the amount of funds distributed monthly to 149 the charter school for the remainder of the fiscal year. The 150 payments shall be issued no later than 10 working days after the 151 sponsor receives a distribution of state or federal funds or the 152 date the payment is due pursuant to this subsection. With 153 respect to federal grant funds submitted for reimbursement, the 154 sponsor shall have 60 calendar days from the date of the 155 submission to reimburse the charter school if the submission 156 provides all the necessary information to qualify for 157 reimbursement. If a warrant for payment is not issued within 10 158 working days after receipt of funding by the sponsor or within 159 60 calendar days after an approved submittal for reimbursement 160 of federal grant funds, the sponsor shall pay to the charter 161 school, in addition to the amount of the scheduled disbursement, 162 interest at a rate of 1 percent per month calculated on a daily 163 basis on the unpaid balance from the expiration of the 10 164 working days or 60 calendar days for the reimbursement of 165 federal grant funds, until such time as the warrant is issued. 166 The district school board may not delay payment to a charter 167 school of any portion of the funds provided in paragraph (b), 168 including any funds from the school districtâs current operating 169 discretionary millage levy authorized under s. 1011.71(1) and 170 (9), based on the timing of receipt of local funds by the 171 district school board. 172 (18)âFACILITIES.â 173 (d)âAny facility, or portion thereof, used to house a 174 charter school whose charter has been approved by the sponsor 175 and the governing board pursuant to subsection (7) is Charter 176 school facilities are exempt from assessments of fees for 177 building permits, except as provided in s. 553.80; fees for 178 building and occupational licenses; impact fees or exactions; 179 service availability fees; and assessments for special benefits. 180 (e)âIf a district school board facility or property is 181 available because it is surplus, marked for disposal, or 182 otherwise unused, it shall be provided for a charter schoolâs 183 use on the same basis as it is made available to other public 184 schools in the district. A charter school receiving property 185 from the sponsor may not sell or dispose of such property 186 without written permission of the sponsor. Similarly, for an 187 existing public school converting to charter status, a district 188 school board may not charge rental or leasing fees for the 189 existing facility or for the property normally inventoried to 190 the conversion school to the parents, principal, school advisory 191 council, or teachers organizing the charter school. The 192 municipality must negotiate rental or leasing fees with the 193 district school board. Property normally inventoried to the 194 school may not be removed. The charter school shall agree to 195 reasonable maintenance provisions in order to maintain the 196 facility in a manner similar to district school board standards. 197 The Public Education Capital Outlay maintenance funds or any 198 other maintenance funds generated by the facility operated as a 199 conversion school or allocated to the facility operated as a 200 conversion school under s. 1013.62 shall remain with the 201 conversion school. 202 (25)âLOCAL EDUCATIONAL AGENCY STATUS FOR CERTAIN CHARTER 203 SCHOOL SYSTEMS.â 204 (a)âA charter school systemâs governing board shall be 205 designated a local educational agency for the purpose of 206 receiving federal funds, the same as though the charter school 207 system were a school district, if the governing board of the 208 charter school system has adopted and filed a resolution with 209 each of its sponsors sponsor and the Department of Education in 210 which the governing board of the charter school system accepts 211 the full responsibility for all local education agency 212 requirements and the charter school system meets all of the 213 following: 214 1.âHas all schools located in the same county; 215 2.âHas a total enrollment exceeding the total enrollment of 216 at least one school district in this state; and 217 2.3.âHas the same governing board. 218 219 Such designation does not apply to other provisions unless 220 specifically provided in law. 221 (26)âSTANDARDS OF CONDUCT AND FINANCIAL DISCLOSURE.â 222 (d)âA landlord of a charter school or his or her spouse or 223 an officer, a director, or an employee of an entity that is a 224 landlord of a charter school or his or her spouse may not be a 225 member of a governing board of a charter school unless the 226 charter school was established pursuant to paragraph (15)(c) or 227 the landlord is either a nonprofit, tax-exempt entity whose 228 mission includes supporting the charter school, or a limited 229 liability company, the sole member of which is the charter 230 school. 231 Section 2.âSubsection (1), paragraphs (b) and (d) of 232 subsection (3), and paragraph (e) of subsection (4) of section 233 1013.62, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 234 1013.62âCharter schools capital outlay funding.â 235 (1)âCharter school capital outlay funding shall consist of 236 state funds when such funds are appropriated in the General 237 Appropriations Act and revenue resulting from the discretionary 238 millage authorized in s. 1011.71(2). 239 (a)âTo be eligible to receive capital outlay funds, a 240 charter school must: 241 1.a.âHave been in operation for 2 or more years; 242 b.âBe governed by a governing board established in the 243 state for 2 or more years which operates both charter schools 244 and conversion charter schools within the state; 245 c.âBe an expanded feeder chain of a charter school within 246 the same school district that is currently receiving charter 247 school capital outlay funds; 248 d.âHave been accredited by a regional accrediting 249 association as defined by State Board of Education rule; 250 e.âServe students in facilities that are provided by a 251 business partner for a charter school-in-the-workplace pursuant 252 to s. 1002.33(15)(b); or 253 f.âBe operated by a hope operator pursuant to s. 1002.333. 254 2.âHave an annual audit that does not reveal any of the 255 financial emergency conditions provided in s. 218.503(1) for the 256 most recent fiscal year for which such audit results are 257 available. 258 3.âHave not earned two consecutive grades of âF,â three 259 consecutive grades below a âC,â or two consecutive school 260 improvement ratings of âUnsatisfactory.â 261 4.âHave received final approval from its sponsor pursuant 262 to s. 1002.33 for operation during that fiscal year. 263 5.âServe students in facilities that are not provided by 264 the charter schoolâs sponsor. 265 6.âAttest in writing to the department that if the charter 266 school is nonrenewed or terminated, any unencumbered funds and 267 all equipment and property purchased with public funds shall 268 revert pursuant to subsection (5). 269 (b)âA charter school is not eligible to receive capital 270 outlay funds if: 271 1.âIt was created by the conversion of a public school and 272 operates in facilities provided by the charter schoolâs sponsor 273 for a nominal fee, or at no charge, or if it is directly or 274 indirectly operated by the school district; 275 2.âIt is a developmental research (laboratory) school that 276 receives state funding for capital improvement purposes pursuant 277 to s. 1002.32(9)(d); 278 2.3.âA member of the governing board, or his or her family 279 member as defined in s. 440.13(1)(b), has an interest in or is 280 an employee of the lessor, excluding charter schools operating 281 pursuant to s. 1002.33(15) and charter schools whose lessor or 282 property owner is a nonprofit, tax-exempt entity whose mission 283 includes supporting the school or a limited liability company 284 whose sole member is the charter school; or 285 3.4.âIt is a Florida College System institution or state 286 university sponsored charter school that receives state funding 287 for capital improvement purposes pursuant to s. 288 1002.33(17)(b)2.d. 289 (3)âIf the school board levies the discretionary millage 290 authorized in s. 1011.71(2), the department shall use the 291 following calculation methodology to determine the amount of 292 revenue that a school district must distribute to each eligible 293 charter school: 294 (b)âDivide the school districtâs adjusted discretionary 295 millage revenue by the districtâs total capital outlay full-time 296 equivalent membership, not to include any full-time equivalent 297 membership of eligible charter schools, and the total number of 298 full-time equivalent students of each eligible charter school to 299 determine a capital outlay allocation per full-time equivalent 300 student. 301 (d)âIf applicable, reduce the capital outlay allocation 302 identified in paragraph (c) by the total amount of state funds 303 allocated to each eligible charter school in subsection (2) to 304 determine the maximum calculated capital outlay allocation. The 305 amount of funds a school district must distribute to charter 306 schools shall be as follows: 307 1.âFor fiscal year 2023-2024, the amount is 20 percent of 308 the amount calculated under this paragraph. 309 2.âFor fiscal year 2024-2025, the amount is 40 percent of 310 the amount calculated under this paragraph. 311 3.âFor fiscal year 2025-2026, the amount is 60 percent of 312 the amount calculated under this paragraph. 313 4.âFor fiscal year 2026-2027, the amount is 80 percent of 314 the amount calculated under this paragraph. 315 5.âFor fiscal year 2027-2028, and each fiscal year 316 thereafter, the amount is 100 percent of the amount calculated 317 under this paragraph. 318 319 By October 1 of each year, each school district shall certify to 320 the department the amount of debt service and participation 321 requirement that complies with the requirement of paragraph (a) 322 and can be reduced from the total discretionary millage revenue. 323 The Auditor General shall verify compliance with the 324 requirements of paragraph (a) and s. 1011.71(2)(e) during 325 scheduled operational audits of school districts. 326 (4)âA charter schoolâs governing body may use charter 327 school capital outlay funds for the following purposes: 328 (e)âRenovation, repair, and maintenance of school 329 facilities that the charter school owns or is purchasing through 330 a lease-purchase, occupies under a or long-term lease of 5 years 331 or longer, or has agreed to maintain under a mutual management 332 plan with the charter schoolâs sponsor. 333 334 Any purchase, lease-purchase, or lease made pursuant to this 335 subsection must be at the appraised value. For purposes of this 336 subsection, the term âappraised valueâ means the fair market 337 value as determined by an independent, Florida-licensed, 338 qualified appraiser selected by the governing board. 339 Documentation of the appraised value shall be provided to the 340 department upon its request. Conversion charter schools may use 341 capital outlay funds received through the reduction in the 342 administrative fee provided in s. 1002.33(20) for renovation, 343 repair, and maintenance of school facilities that are owned by 344 the sponsor. 345 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.